Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1956.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(bb) The term "sex" means only the sexes of male and female, as determined by an individual's biological sex at birth, and 123456789101112131415161718192021 does not include any concept of gender that is distinguishable from biological sex.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1956PN2473 - 2 - 123